Illinois, session 104th, HB2624.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Parental Notice of Abortion Act of 2025. 6    Section 5. Legislative findings and purpose. The General 7Assembly finds that notification of a family member as defined 8in this Act is in the best interest of an unemancipated minor, 9and the General Assembly's purpose in enacting this parental 10notice law is to further and protect the best interests of an 11unemancipated minor.12    The medical, emotional, and psychological consequences of 13abortion are sometimes serious and long-lasting, and immature 14minors often lack the ability to make fully informed choices 15that consider both the immediate and long-range consequences.16    Parental consultation is usually in the best interest of 17the minor and is desirable since the capacity to become 18pregnant and the capacity for mature judgment concerning the 19wisdom of an abortion are not necessarily related. 20    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:21    "Abortion" means the use of any instrument, medicine, 22drug, or any other substance or device to terminate the   HB2624- 2 -LRB104 10385 SPS 20460 b1pregnancy of a woman known to be pregnant with an intention 2other than to increase the probability of a live birth, to 3preserve the life or health of a child after live birth, or to 4remove a dead fetus.5    "Actual notice" means the giving of notice directly, in 6person, or by telephone.7    "Adult family member" means a person over 21 years of age 8who is the parent, grandparent, step-parent living in the 9household, or legal guardian.10    "Constructive notice" means notice by certified mail to 11the last known address of the person entitled to notice with 12delivery deemed to have occurred 48 hours after the certified 13notice is mailed.14    "Incompetent" means any person who has been adjudged as 15mentally ill or as a person with a developmental disability 16and who, because of her mental illness or developmental 17disability, is not fully able to manage her person and for whom 18a guardian of the person has been appointed under paragraph 19(1) of subsection (a) of Section 11a-3 of the Probate Act of 201975.21    "Medical emergency" means a condition that, on the basis 22of the physician's good faith clinical judgment, so 23complicates the medical condition of a pregnant woman as to 24necessitate the immediate abortion of her pregnancy to avert 25her death or for which a delay will create serious risk of 26substantial and irreversible impairment of major bodily   HB2624- 3 -LRB104 10385 SPS 20460 b1function.2    "Minor" means any person under 18 years of age who is not 3or has not been married or who has not been emancipated under 4the Emancipation of Minors Act.5    "Neglect" means the failure of an adult family member to 6supply a child with necessary food, clothing, shelter, or 7medical care when reasonably able to do so or the failure to 8protect a child from conditions or actions that imminently and 9seriously endanger the child's physical or mental health when 10reasonably able to do so.11    "Physical abuse" means any physical injury intentionally 12inflicted by an adult family member on a child.13    "Physician" means any person licensed to practice medicine 14in all its branches under the Illinois Medical Practice Act of 151987.16    "Sexual abuse" means any sexual conduct or sexual 17penetration as defined in Section 11-0.1 of the Criminal Code 18of 2012 that is prohibited by the criminal laws of the State 19and committed against a minor by an adult family member as 20defined in this Act. 21    Section 15. Notice to adult family member. No person shall 22knowingly perform an abortion upon a minor or upon an 23incompetent person unless the physician or his or her agent 24has given at least 48 hours actual notice to an adult family 25member of the pregnant minor or incompetent person of his or   HB2624- 4 -LRB104 10385 SPS 20460 b1her intention to perform the abortion, unless that person or 2his or her agent has received a written statement by a 3referring physician certifying that the referring physician or 4his or her agent has given at least 48 hours notice to an adult 5family member of the pregnant minor or incompetent person. If 6actual notice is not possible after a reasonable effort, the 7physician or his or her agent must give 48 hours constructive 8notice. 9    Section 20. Exceptions. Notice shall not be required under 10this Act if:11        (1) the minor or incompetent person is accompanied by 12    a person entitled to notice; 13        (2) notice is waived in writing by a person who is 14    entitled to notice; 15        (3) the attending physician certifies in the patient's 16    medical record that a medical emergency exists and there 17    is insufficient time to provide the required notice;18        (4) the minor declares in writing that she is a victim 19    of sexual abuse, neglect, or physical abuse by an adult 20    family member as defined in this Act. The attending 21    physician must certify in the patient's medical record 22    that he or she has received the written declaration of 23    abuse or neglect. Any notification of public authorities 24    of abuse that may be required under other laws of this 25    State need not be made by the person performing the   HB2624- 5 -LRB104 10385 SPS 20460 b1    abortion until after the minor receives an abortion that 2    otherwise complies with the requirements of this Act; or3        (5) notice is waived under Section 25. 4    Section 25. Procedure for judicial waiver of notice. 5    (a) The requirements and procedures under this Section are 6available to minors and incompetent persons whether or not 7they are residents of this State.8    (b) The minor or incompetent person may petition any 9circuit court for a waiver of the notice requirement and may 10participate in proceedings on her own behalf. The court shall 11appoint a guardian ad litem for her. Any guardian ad litem 12appointed under this Act shall act to maintain the 13confidentiality of the proceedings. The circuit court shall 14advise her that she has a right to court-appointed counsel and 15shall provide her with counsel upon her request.16    (c) Court proceedings under this Section shall be 17confidential and shall ensure the anonymity of the minor or 18incompetent person. All court proceedings under this Section 19shall be sealed. The minor or incompetent person shall have 20the right to file her petition in the circuit court using a 21pseudonym or using solely her initials. All documents related 22to this petition shall be confidential and shall not be made 23available to the public.24    These proceedings shall be given precedence over other 25pending matters to the extent necessary to ensure that the   HB2624- 6 -LRB104 10385 SPS 20460 b1court reaches a decision promptly. The court shall rule and 2issue written findings of fact and conclusions of law within 348 hours of the time that the petition is filed, except that 4the 48-hour limitation may be extended at the request of the 5minor or incompetent person. If the court fails to rule within 6the 48-hour period and an extension is not requested, then the 7petition shall be deemed to have been granted, and the notice 8requirement shall be waived.9    (d) Notice shall be waived if the court finds by a 10preponderance of the evidence either:11        (1) that the minor or incompetent person is 12    sufficiently mature and well enough informed to decide 13    intelligently whether to have an abortion; or14        (2) that notification under Section 15 would not be in 15    the best interests of the minor or incompetent person.16    (e) A court that conducts proceedings under this Section 17shall issue written and specific factual findings and legal 18conclusions supporting its decision and shall order that a 19confidential record of the evidence and the judge's findings 20and conditions be maintained.21    (f) An expedited confidential appeal shall be available, 22as the Supreme Court provides by rule, to any minor or 23incompetent person to whom the circuit court denies a waiver 24of notice. An order authorizing an abortion without notice 25shall not be subject to appeal.26    (g) The Supreme Court is respectfully requested to adopt   HB2624- 7 -LRB104 10385 SPS 20460 b1any rules necessary to ensure that proceedings under this Act 2are handled in an expeditious and confidential manner.3    (h) No fees shall be required of any minor or incompetent 4person who avails herself of the procedures provided by this 5Section. 6    Section 30. Minor's consent to abortion. A person may not 7perform an abortion on a minor without the minor's consent, 8except in a medical emergency. 9    Section 35. Reports. The Department of Public Health shall 10comply with the reporting requirements set forth in the 11consent decree in Herbst v. O'Malley, case no. 84-C-5602 in 12the U.S. District Court for the Northern District of Illinois, 13Eastern Division. 14    Section 40. Penalties. 15    (a) Any physician who willfully fails to provide notice as 16required under this Act before performing an abortion on a 17minor or an incompetent person shall be referred to the 18Illinois State Medical Board for action in accordance with 19Section 22 of the Medical Practice Act of 1987.20    (b) Any person, not authorized under this Act, who signs 21any waiver of notice for a minor or incompetent person seeking 22an abortion, is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.   HB2624- 8 -LRB104 10385 SPS 20460 b1    Section 45. Immunity. Any physician who, in good faith, 2provides notice in accordance with Section 15 or relies on an 3exception under Section 20 shall not be subject to any type of 4civil or criminal liability or discipline for unprofessional 5conduct for failure to give required notice. 6    Section 50. Severability and inseverability. If any 7provision of this Act or its application to any person or 8circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity of that provision 9or application does not affect other provisions or 10applications of the Act that can be given effect without the 11invalid provision or application, except that Section 25 is 12inseverable to the extent that if all or any substantial and 13material part of Section 25 is held invalid, then the entire 14Act is invalid. 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.